Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 4. Satisfaction of Judgments.

Cross references. —

For acknowledgment of satisfaction of liens, see AS

34.35.900

.

Collateral references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d, Judgments, §§ 804-855.

50 C.J.S., Judgments, § 869 et seq.

Sec. 09.30.300.
Satisfaction of judgment.

Satisfaction of a judgment may be entered upon an execution returned satisfied, or upon an acknowledgment of satisfaction filed with the clerk, which may recite payment of the judgment in full or the acceptance by the judgment creditor of any lesser sum in full satisfaction of the judgment, made in the manner of an acknowledgment of a conveyance of real property by the judgment creditor or assignee of record, or by the attorney for the judgment creditor or assignee unless a revocation of the attorney’s authority is filed. When a judgment is satisfied otherwise than upon an execution, the judgment creditor or the judgment creditor’s attorney shall deliver a written acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment suitable for recordation immediately upon payment in cash or within 10 days after payment if payment is made in any other manner, and, upon motion, the court may compel an acknowledgment of satisfaction or may order the entry of satisfaction to be made without it. When the state or an authorized officer or agency of the state is the judgment creditor, a written acknowledgment of satisfaction shall be delivered within 15 days after payment in cash or within 30 days after payment if payment is made in any other manner. The entry of satisfaction shall be made upon the civil docket of the court rendering the judgment satisfied.

A judgment creditor or assignee who, after payment in full of the judgment and after written demand by the judgment debtor, fails without just cause for a period of 30 days to execute and file an acknowledgment of satisfaction with the court is liable to the judgment debtor or the grantees or heirs of the judgment debtor for all damages that may be sustained by reason of that failure and shall also forfeit to the judgment debtor or the grantees or heirs of the judgment debtor the sum of $100.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1978)

Sec. 09.30.310.
Recordation of acknowledgment of satisfaction.

If a certified copy of the judgment has been recorded with the recorder of any recording district, as provided in AS

09.30.010

, then the acknowledgment required under AS

09.30.300

must identify the book and page of the official record in which the judgment has been recorded or the serial number assigned to the judgment by the recorder and show the full name of the judgment debtor as it appears upon the judgment recorded.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1978; am § 11 ch 35 SLA 2003)